Nevada, session 83, AB12.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 612.530 is hereby amended to read as follows:
612.530 1. Within 11 days after the decision of the Board of
Review has become final, any party aggrieved thereby or the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
Administrator may secure judicial review thereof by commencing
an action in the district court of the county where the employment
which is the basis of the claim was performed for the review of the
decision, in which action any other party to the proceedings before
the Board of Review must be made a defendant.
2. In such action, a petition which need not be verified, but
which must state the grounds upon which a review is sought, must,
within 45 days after the commencement of the action, be served
upon the Administrator at a designated office of the Administrator
in Carson City, unless the Administrator is the appellant, or upon
such person as the Administrator may designate, and such service
shall be deemed completed service on all parties, but there must be
left with the party so served as many copies of the petition as there
are defendants, and the Administrator shall forthwith mail one such
copy to each defendant. Service of a petition pursuant to this
subsection must comply with the provisions of this subsection and
the applicable provisions of the Nevada Rules of Civil Procedure
for the service of a summons and complaint.
3. [The] If the appellant fails to serve upon the Administrator,
or upon such person as the Administrator may designate, any
petition pursuant to subsection 2, including, without limitation, a
petition that does not comply or is served in a manner that does
not comply with the requirements of subsection 2, within 45 days
after the commencement of the action, the court is deprived of
jurisdiction over the action and shall dismiss the action upon the
motion of the Administrator.
4. If the appellant serves upon the Administrator, or upon
such person as the Administrator may designate, a petition
pursuant to subsection 2 within 45 days after the commencement
of the action, the Administrator may, within 45 days after the
receipt of the petition, file a motion with the court to dismiss the
action on the basis that the petition did not comply or was served
in a manner that did not comply with the requirements of
subsection 2. Within 10 business days after the filing of the motion
to dismiss, the appellant shall cure each deficiency concerning the
petition, if any. The requirement to cure any deficiency
concerning the petition within 10 business days after the filing of
the motion to dismiss must be strictly complied with and may not
be excused by the court. Failure to comply with that requirement
deprives the court of jurisdiction over the action and, if the court
determines that the petition did not comply or was served in a
manner that did not comply with the requirements of subsection 2
and the deficiencies concerning the petition were not cured within
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
10 business days after the filing of the motion to dismiss, the court
shall grant the motion to dismiss.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
Administrator shall file with the court an answer within 45 days
after being served with a petition pursuant to subsection 2 [or, if]
unless the Administrator filed with the court a motion to dismiss
pursuant to subsection 4 and the motion was denied, in which case
the Administrator shall file the answer within 45 days after the
date on which the motion was denied. If the Administrator is the
appellant, the Administrator shall serve the petition upon each other
party within 45 days after commencement of the action. With the
Administrator’s answer or petition, the Administrator shall certify
and file with the court originals or true copies of all documents and
papers and a transcript of all testimony taken in the matter, together
with the Board of Review’s findings of fact and decision therein.
The Administrator may certify to the court questions of law
involved in any decision.
[4.] 6. In any judicial proceedings under this section, the
finding of the Board of Review as to the facts, if supported by
evidence and in the absence of fraud, is conclusive, and the
jurisdiction of the court is confined to questions of law.
[5.] 7. Such actions, and the questions so certified, must be
heard in a summary manner and must be given precedence over all
other civil cases except cases arising under chapters 616A to 616D,
inclusive, or chapter 617 of NRS.
[6.] 8. An appeal may be taken from the decision of the district
court to the appellate court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to the
rules fixed by the Supreme Court of Nevada pursuant to Section 4 of
Article 6 of the Nevada Constitution in the same manner, but not
inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter, as is provided in
civil cases.
[7.] 9. It is not necessary, in any judicial proceeding under this
section, to enter exceptions to the rulings of the Board of Review,
and no bond may be required for entering the appeal.
[8.] 10. Upon the final determination of the judicial
proceeding, the Board of Review shall enter an order in accordance
with the determination.
[9.] 11. A petition for judicial review does not act as a
supersedeas or stay unless the Board of Review so orders.
Sec. 2. The amendatory provisions of this act apply to a
petition for judicial review that is filed on or after the effective date
of this act.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective upon passage and approval.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)